Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3826
(UTC 305) Appointment of representative.

(UTC 305) (a) If the court determines that an interest is not represented under sections 30-3822 to 30-3826, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a representative to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

(b) A representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

(c) In making decisions, a representative may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual's family.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 26.

Under section 30-3837(b), the party seeking a modification of a trust must affirmatively demonstrate that all beneficiaries have consented to the modification. The issue of consent for unknown beneficiaries must be resolved pursuant to section 30-3825 and this section. In re Trust of Shire, 299 Neb. 25, 907 N.W.2d 263 (2018).